Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.030

Noncertified tribes—Detention—Notice. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

A place of detention shall provide notice to the tribal law enforcement within the jurisdiction of a noncertified tribe who issued an arrest warrant for a tribal fugitive as soon as practicable after learning that the tribal fugitive is a prisoner in the place of detention. The notice shall include the reason for the detention and the anticipated date of release, if known.

[ 2024 c 207 s 4.]